District of Columbia statutes.
32-1351

Hiring of qualified ex-offenders.

The Department of Public Works shall hire qualified ex-offenders to fill at least 26.9 full-time equivalent positions dedicated to the agency’s alley-cutback, graffiti-removal, and other public works programs.

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 6132, 54 DCR 7052
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6132 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
Short title: Section 6131 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle N of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Hiring of Ex-Offenders Act of 2007”.